District of Columbia statutes.
16-2358

Conduct of hearings.

(a)

All hearings and proceedings on a motion to terminate the parent and child relationship shall be held by the judge, without a jury.

(b)

All hearings and proceedings held pursuant to this subchapter shall be recorded by appropriate means.

(c)

Except in hearings to declare a person in contempt of court, the general public shall be excluded from hearings and proceedings arising pursuant to this subchapter. Only persons necessary to such hearings and proceedings shall be admitted, but a judge may, pursuant to rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, admit such other persons as have a proper interest in the case or the work of the Division on the condition that they refrain from divulging information identifying the child involved in the proceedings or members of his or her family.

(d)

If a judge finds it is in the best interests of the child, he or she may temporarily exclude the child from any proceeding. Under no circumstances, however, may counsel in the case be excluded.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2358.
1973 Ed., § 16-2358.